Colorado statutes. TITLE 6 Consumer and Commercial Affairs
ARTICLE 17
UNIFORM RECORDS RETENTION ACT

Section

6-17-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Uniform Records Retention Act".

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 384, § 1, effective July 1.

6-17-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds that there is a need to minimize the paperwork burden associated with the retention of business records for individuals, small businesses, state and local agencies, corporations, and other persons, and there is a need to minimize the costs of collecting, maintaining, using, storing, and disseminating information and business records. The general assembly therefore finds that the provisions of this article are necessary to promote efficiency and economy.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 384, § 1, effective July 1.

6-17-103. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Business record" means books of account; vouchers; documents; canceled checks; payrolls; correspondence; records of sales, personnel, equipment, and production; reports relating to any or all of such records; and other business papers.

"Record" means any letter, word, sound, number, or its equivalent, set down by handwriting, typewriting, printing, photostating, photographing, magnetic impulse, mechanical, or electronic recording of other forms of data compilation. Unless otherwise specified, reproductions are records for purposes of this article.

"Reproduction" means any counterpart produced by the same impression as the original or from the same matrix, or by means of photography, including enlargements and miniatures, or by mechanical or electronic rerecording or by chemical reproduction or by any equivalent technique which accurately reproduces the original.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 384, § 1, effective July 1.

6-17-104. Records retention period.

Any record required to be created or kept by any state or local law or regulation may be destroyed after three years from the date of creation, unless such law or regulation establishes a specified records retention period or a specific procedure to be followed prior to destruction.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 385, § 1, effective July 1.

6-17-105. Form of record.

Retention of reproductions produced pursuant to this article shall constitute compliance with any state or local law requiring that any record be created or kept.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 385, § 1, effective July 1.

6-17-106. Scope of article.

This article shall apply to all records prepared by private individuals, partnerships, corporations, or any other association, whether carried on for profit or not, and to any government entity operating under the laws of this state and shall apply to all records created before and after July 1, 1990.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 385, § 1, effective July 1.